Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-532
Test results reportable; manner.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which make the human immunodeficiency virus infection reportable by name in the same manner as communicable diseases under section 71-502.

Laws 1994, LB 819, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 510;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 397.